West Virginia, session 2026, HB4325.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 10. Authorization for Department of commerce to promulgate legislative rules. §64-10-1. Division of Labor. The legislative rule filed in the State Register on July 24, 2025, authorized under the authority of §21-6-11 of this code, modified by the Division of Labor to meet the objections of the Legislative Rule-Making Review Committee and refiled in the State Register on September 10, 2025, relating to the Division of Labor (child labor, 42 CSR 09), is authorized.